Mississippi statutes. Title 25. Public Officers and Employees; Public Records
Chapter 13. Highway Safety Patrol Retirement System
§ 25-13-15.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1979, ch. 415, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

[Codes, 1942, § 8090-58; Laws, 1958, ch. 543, § 8]

§ 25-13-16.
Retirement benefit options; definitions.

Upon application for superannuation or disability retirement, any member who retires after July 1, 1990, may elect to receive his benefit pursuant to the provisions of Sections 25-13-11 and 25-13-13. Or he may elect upon retirement, or upon becoming eligible for retirement, to receive the actuarial equivalent, subject to the provisions of subsection (3) of this section, of his retirement allowance in a reduced retirement allowance payable throughout life with the provision that:

Option 1.If he dies before he has received in annuity payment the value of the member’s annuity savings account as it was at the time of his retirement, the balance shall be paid to his legal representative or to such person as he shall nominate by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the board; or

Option 2.Upon his death, his reduced retirement allowance shall be continued throughout the life of, and paid to, such person as he has nominated by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the board of trustees at the time of his retirement;

Option 3.Upon his death, one-half (1/2) of his reduced retirement allowance shall be continued throughout the life of, and paid to, such person as he shall have nominated by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the board of trustees at the time of his retirement, and the other one-half (1/2) of his reduced retirement allowance to some other designated beneficiary;

Option 4.Upon his death, three-fourths (3/4) of his reduced retirement allowance, or such other specified amount, shall be continued throughout the life of, and paid to, such person he shall have nominated by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the board of trustees at the time of his retirement;

Option 4-A.Upon his death, one-half (1/2) of his reduced retirement allowance, or such other specified amount, shall be continued throughout the life of, and paid to, such person as he shall have nominated by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the board of trustees at the time of his retirement; or

Option 4-B.A reduced retirement allowance shall be continued throughout the life of the retirant, but with the further guarantee of payments to the named beneficiary or beneficiaries for a specified number of years certain. If the retired member or the last designated beneficiary both die prior to receiving all guaranteed payments due, the actuarial equivalent of the remaining payments shall be paid to the successors of the retired member under Section 25-13-21.1(1);

Option 4-C.Such retirement allowance otherwise payable may be converted into a retirement allowance of equivalent actuarial value in such an amount that, with the member’s benefit under Title II of the federal Social Security Act, the member will receive, so far as possible, approximately the same amount annually before and after the earliest age at which the member becomes eligible to receive a social security benefit. This option shall not be available to retirees whose retirement is effective on or after July 1, 2004;

Option 6.Any member who is eligible to retire with an unreduced benefit may select the maximum retirement benefit or an optional benefit as provided in this subsection together with a partial lump-sum distribution. The amount of the lump-sum distribution under this option shall be equal to the maximum monthly benefit multiplied by twelve (12), twenty-four (24) or thirty-six (36) as selected by the member. The maximum retirement benefit shall be actuarially reduced to reflect the amount of the lump-sum distribution selected and further reduced for any other optional benefit selected. The annuity and lump-sum distribution shall be computed to result in no actuarial loss to the system. The lump-sum distribution shall be made as a single payment payable at the time the first monthly annuity payment is paid to the retiree. The amount of the lump-sum distribution shall be deducted from the member’s annuity savings account in computing what contributions remain at the death of the retiree and/or a beneficiary. The lump-sum distribution option may be elected only once by a member upon initial retirement, and may not be elected by a retiree, by members applying for a disability retirement annuity, by survivors or by a member selecting Option 4-C.

No change in the option selected shall be permitted after the member’s death or after the member has received his first retirement check, except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section. However, any retired member who is receiving a retirement allowance under Option 2 or Option 4-A upon July 1, 1999, and whose designated beneficiary predeceased him or whose marriage to a spouse who is his designated beneficiary is terminated by divorce or other dissolution, upon written notification to the retirement system of the death of the designated beneficiary or of the termination of his marriage to his designated beneficiary, the retirement allowance payable to the member after receipt of such notification by the retirement system shall be equal to the retirement allowance that would have been payable if the member had not elected the option. In addition, any retired member who is receiving the maximum retirement allowance for life, a retirement allowance under Option 1 or who is receiving a retirement allowance under Option 2 or Option 4-A on July 1, 1999, may elect to provide survivor benefits under Option 2 or Option 4-A to a spouse who was not previously the member’s beneficiary and who the member married before July 1, 1999. Should a member retired on disability be returned to active service, the option previously selected shall be null and void. Upon subsequent retirement a new option may be selected.

Any retired member who is receiving a reduced retirement allowance under Option 2, Option 4 or Option 4-A whose designated beneficiary predeceases him, or whose marriage to a spouse who is his designated beneficiary is terminated by divorce or other dissolution, may elect to cancel his reduced retirement allowance and receive the maximum retirement allowance for life in an amount equal to the amount that would have been payable if the member had not elected Option 2, Option 4 or Option 4-A. Such election must be made in writing to the office of the executive director of the system on a form prescribed by the board. Any such election shall be effective the first of the month following the date the election is received by the system; however, the election may be applied retroactively for not more than three (3) months but no earlier than the first of the month following the date of the death of the beneficiary.

Any retired member who is receiving the maximum retirement allowance for life, or a retirement allowance under Option 1, and who marries after his retirement may elect to cancel his maximum retirement allowance and receive a reduced retirement allowance under Option 2, Option 4 or Option 4-A to provide continuing lifetime benefits to his spouse. Such election must be made in writing to the office of the executive director of the system on a form prescribed by the board not earlier than the date of the marriage. Any such election shall be effective the first of the month following the date the election is received by the system. However, if a retiree marries or remarries after retirement and elects either Option 2, Option 4 or Option 4-A as provided in subsection (2) or (4) of this section, the actuarial equivalent factor used to compute the reduced retirement allowance shall be the factor for the age of the retiree and his or her beneficiary at the time such election for recalculation of benefits is made.

Any member in service who has qualified for retirement benefits may select any optional method of settlement of retirement benefits by notifying the Executive Director of the Board of Trustees of the Public Employees’ Retirement System in writing, on a form prescribed by the board, of the option he has selected and by naming the beneficiary of such option and furnishing necessary proof of age. Such option, once selected, may be changed at any time prior to actual retirement or death, but upon the death or retirement of the member, the optional settlement shall be placed in effect upon proper notification to the executive director.

Notwithstanding any provision of Section 25-13-1 et seq., no payments may be made for a retirement allowance on a monthly basis for a period of time in excess of that allowed by federal law.

If a retirant and his eligible beneficiary, if any, both die before they have received in annuity payments a total amount equal to the accumulated contributions standing to the retirant’s credit in the annuity savings account at the time of his retirement, the difference between the accumulated contributions and the total amount of annuities received by them shall be paid to such persons as the retirant has nominated by written designation duly executed and filed in the office of the executive director. If no designated person survives the retirant and his beneficiary, the difference, if any, shall be paid pursuant to Section 25-13-21.1(1).

Any retired member who retired on Option 2(5) or 4-A(5) before July 1, 1999, who is still receiving a retirement allowance as of July 1, 1999, shall receive an increase in the annual retirement allowance effective July 1, 1999, equal to the amount they would have received under Option 2 or Option 4-A without a reduction for Option 5 based on the ages at retirement of the retiree and beneficiary and option factors in effect on July 1, 1999. Such increase shall be prospective only.

For purposes of this section:

“Beneficiary” means any person designated to receive a retirement allowance, an annuity or other benefit as provided by this chapter. Such designation shall be in writing filed in the Office of the Executive Director of the Board of Trustees of the Public Employees’ Retirement System, and no designation or change of beneficiary shall be made in any other manner; however, notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, the lawful spouse of a member at the time of the death of a member shall be the beneficiary of such member unless the member has designated another beneficiary subsequent to the date of marriage.

“Actuarial equivalent” shall mean a benefit of equal value to the accumulated contributions, annuity or benefit, as the case may be, when computed upon the basis of such mortality tables as shall be adopted by the board of trustees, and regular interest.

“Actuarial tables” shall mean such tables of mortality and rates of interest as shall be adopted by the board in accordance with the recommendation of the actuary.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 472, § 2; Laws, 1991, ch. 387 § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 587, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 544, § 10; Laws, 2000, ch. 628, § 18; Laws, 2002, ch. 627, § 16; Laws, 2008, ch. 359, § 4; Laws, 2010, ch. 528, § 10; Laws, 2011, ch. 369, § 2; Laws, 2017, ch. 338, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 25-13-17.
Credit for prior time served in highway safety patrol, armed forces.

All persons who are covered under the terms of this chapter on July 1, 1958 and who become members of the retirement system shall cease to be members under the provisions of Sections 25-11-101 through 25-11-139 upon July 1, 1958, and shall become members of this retirement system with full credit for all prior service with the Highway Safety Patrol.

In computing the period of service of a member of the Highway Safety Patrol, any member who served on active duty in the Armed Forces of the United States, or who served in maritime service during periods of hostility in World War II, shall be entitled to creditable service at no cost for his service on active duty in the Armed Forces or in such maritime service, provided he entered state service after his discharge from the Armed Forces or entered state service after he completed such maritime service. The maximum period for such creditable service for all military service as defined in this subsection (2) shall not exceed four (4) years unless positive proof can be furnished by such person that he was retained in the Armed Forces during World War II or in maritime service during World War II, by causes beyond his control and without opportunity of discharge. The member shall furnish proof satisfactory to the Board of Trustees of the Public Employees’ Retirement System of certification of military service or maritime service records showing dates of entrance into active duty service and the date of discharge. No creditable service shall be granted for any military service or maritime service to a member who qualifies for a retirement allowance in another public retirement system administered by the Board of Trustees of the Public Employees’ Retirement System based in whole or in part on such military or maritime service. In no case shall the member receive creditable service if the member received a dishonorable discharge from the Armed Forces of the United States.

The credit for military service granted in this subsection shall apply to all persons who have retired from the Highway Patrol and who qualify for credit as outlined above, whether they retired before or after July 1, 2000; but this provision shall not operate to require any back payments of retirement.

Any member of the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol Retirement System whose membership service is interrupted as a result of qualified military service within the meaning of Section 414(u)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code, and who has received the maximum service credit available under subsection (2) of this section, shall receive creditable service for the period of qualified military service that does not qualify as creditable service under subsection (2) of this section upon reentering membership service in an amount not to exceed five (5) years if:

The member pays the contributions he would have made to the retirement system if he had remained in membership service for the period of qualified military service based upon his salary at the time his membership service was interrupted;

The member returns to membership service within ninety (90) days of the end of his qualified military service; and

The employer at the time the member’s service was interrupted and to which employment the member returns pays the contributions it would have made into the retirement system for such period based on the member’s salary at the time the service was interrupted.

The payments required to be made in paragraph (a)(i) of this subsection may be made over a period beginning with the date of return to membership service and not exceeding three (3) times the member’s qualified military service; however, in no event shall such period exceed five (5) years.

The member shall furnish proof satisfactory to the board of trustees of certification of military service showing dates of entrance into qualified service and the date of discharge as well as proof that the member has returned to active employment within the time specified.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8090-59; Laws, 1958, ch. 543, § 9; Laws, 1974, ch. 413; Laws, 1980, ch. 470, § 3; Laws, 2000, ch. 419, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 438, § 6; Laws, 2002, ch. 627, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 25-13-19.
Transfer of state retirement annuity fund contributions.

In any case in which a highway patrolman has been a member of the state retirement annuity system under Sections 25-11-101 through 25-11-139 and has made contributions thereto, all employee’s contributions, plus interest credited thereto, inuring to the credit of any such highway patrolman shall be transferred by the public employees’ retirement system to the credit of the individual highway patrolman in the disability and relief fund established by this chapter, and shall be considered an asset to the credit of the highway patrolman in this retirement system.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8090-60; Laws, 1958, ch. 543, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1958.

§ 25-13-21.
Refund of contributions; rollover distribution to retirement plan or account; repayment of refund upon subsequent reentry into service.

In the event a highway patrolman ceases to work for the Highway Safety Patrol for any reason other than occupational disease contracted or for any accident sustained by the patrolman by reason of his service or discharge of his duty in the Highway Patrol, and if the highway patrolman is not eligible for retirement either for service or disability, he shall be refunded the amount of his total contribution under the provisions of this chapter, including any credit transferred to his account in this system from any other system, at his request; and should he die before retirement, his total contribution is to be refunded to any beneficiary he may name. If there is no surviving designated beneficiary, the contributions to the credit of the deceased member shall be refunded pursuant to Section 25-13-21.1(1).

Pursuant to the Unemployment Compensation Amendments of 1992 (Public Law 102-318 (UCA)), a member or the spouse of a member who is an eligible beneficiary entitled to a refund under this section may elect, on a form prescribed by the board under rules and regulations established by the board, to have an eligible rollover distribution of accumulated contributions payable under this section paid directly to an eligible retirement plan, as defined under applicable federal law, or an individual retirement account. If the member or the spouse of a member who is an eligible beneficiary makes that election and specifies the eligible retirement plan or individual retirement account to which the distribution is to be paid, the distribution will be made in the form of a direct trustee-to-trustee transfer to the specified eligible retirement plan. A nonspouse beneficiary may elect to have an eligible rollover distribution paid in the form of a direct trustee-to-trustee transfer to an individual retirement account established to receive the distribution on behalf of the nonspouse beneficiary. Flexible rollovers under this subsection shall not be considered assignments under Section 25-13-31.

If any highway patrolman who receives a refund reenters the service of the Highway Safety Patrol and again becomes a member of the system, he may repay all amounts previously received by him as a refund, together with regular interest covering the period from the date of refund to the date of repayment; however, the amounts that are repaid by the member and the creditable service related thereto shall not be used in any benefit calculation or determination until the member has remained a contributor to the system for a period of at least five (5) years after the member’s reentry into state service. Repayment for such time shall be made beginning with the most recent service for which refund has been made. Upon the repayment of all or part of the refund and interest, the highway patrolman shall again receive credit for the period of creditable service for which full repayment has been made to the system.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8090-61; Laws, 1958, ch. 543, § 11; Laws, 1977, ch. 363; Laws, 1999, ch. 544, § 11; Laws, 2000, ch. 628, § 19; Laws, 2001, ch. 438, § 7; Laws, 2002, ch. 313, § 5; Laws, 2008, ch. 359, § 7; Laws, 2016, ch. 397, § 16; Laws, 2017, ch. 338, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 25-13-21.1.
Persons to whom benefits payable in event of death of designated beneficiary.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, where benefits are payable to a designated beneficiary or beneficiaries under this article and the designated beneficiary or beneficiaries as provided by the member on the most recent form filed with the system are deceased or otherwise disqualified at the time such benefits become payable, the following persons, in descending order of precedence, shall be eligible to receive such benefits:

The surviving spouse of the member or retiree;

The children of the member or retiree or their descendants, per stirpes;

The brothers and sisters of the member or retiree or their descendants, per stirpes;

The parents of the member or retiree;

The executor or administrator on behalf of the member or retiree’s estate;

The persons entitled by law to distribution of the member or retiree’s estate.

Any monthly benefits payable to a beneficiary who dies prior to cashing his or her final check(s) and/or any additional benefits payable pursuant to Section 25-13-12 still payable at the death of a beneficiary receiving monthly benefits shall be paid as follows:

The surviving spouse of the beneficiary;

The children of the beneficiary or their descendants, per stirpes;

The brothers and sisters of the beneficiary or their descendants, per stirpes;

The parents of the beneficiary;

The executor or administrator on behalf of the beneficiary’s estate;

The persons entitled by law to distribution of the beneficiary’s estate.

In the event no claim is made by any individual listed in subsection (2) of this section, a distribution may be made pursuant to the provisions of subsection (1) of this section.

Payment under the provisions of this section shall bar recovery by any other person of the benefits distributed. Payment of benefits made to one or more members of a class of individuals are made on behalf of all members of the class. Any members of the class coming forward after payment is made must look to those who received the payment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 628, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

§ 25-13-22.
Retirement system authorized to accept eligible rollover distributions to repay fund or for purchase of optional service credit.

Effective July 1, 2000, and subject to the rules adopted by the board of trustees, the system shall accept an eligible rollover distribution or a direct transfer of funds from another eligible retirement plan, as defined under applicable federal law, or an individual retirement account, in payment of all or a portion of the cost to purchase optional service credit or to reinstate previously withdrawn service credit as permitted by the system. The system may only accept rollover payments in an amount equal to or less than the balance due for purchase or reinstatement of service credit. The rules adopted by the board shall condition the acceptance of a rollover or transfer from another eligible retirement plan or an individual retirement account on the receipt of information necessary to enable the system to determine the eligibility of any transferred funds for tax-free rollover treatment or other treatment under federal income tax law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1999, ch. 544, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1999; Laws, 2002, ch. 313, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 14, 2002).

§ 25-13-23.
Non-covered employees.

All other employees of the Mississippi highway safety patrol who are not covered by this chapter shall continue as members of the Public Employees’ Retirement System of Mississippi as set forth in Sections 25-11-1 through 25-11-139, and shall continue to be subject to all provisions of said sections.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8090-62; Laws, 1958, ch. 543, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1958.

§ 25-13-25.
Administrative board.

There is established an administrative board for the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol Retirement System, which shall be composed of the Commissioner of Public Safety, four (4) active members of the retirement system elected by the active members of the system, and one (1) retired member of the retirement system elected by the retired members of the system. The administrative board, with approval of the Attorney General, may make any and all regulations necessary for the efficient, orderly and successful operation of this chapter, not inconsistent herewith. This is a remedial chapter and entitled to a broad and liberal interpretation to accomplish its purpose.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8090-63; Laws, 1958, ch. 543, § 13; Laws, 1999, ch. 544, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§ 25-13-27.
Cost of administering fund; maintenance and disclosure of records.

The Public Employees’ Retirement System of Mississippi is hereby authorized to deduct two percent (2%) of all employers’ contributions paid into the “disability and relief fund for members of the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol” to be transferred to the expense fund of the Public Employees’ Retirement System of Mississippi to defray the cost of administering this fund. All books, accounts, and records shall be kept in the general office of the Public Employees’ Retirement System of Mississippi and shall be public records except for individual member records. The system shall not disclose the name, address or contents of any individual member records without the prior written consent of the individual to whom the record pertains.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8090-64; Laws, 1958, ch. 543, § 14; Laws, 1988, ch. 396, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1986.

§ 25-13-28.
Interest on employee reserve account.

Regular interest shall be credited annually to the mean amount of the employee reserve account for the preceding year. This credit shall be made annually from interest and other earnings on the invested assets of this system. Any additional amount required to meet the regular interest on the funds of this system shall be charged to the employer’s accumulation account, and any excess of earnings over such regular interest required shall be credited to the employer’s accumulation account. Regular interest shall mean the percentage rate of interest compounded annually as determined by the Board of Trustees of the Public Employees’ Retirement System.

Once interest is credited it shall be added to the sum of all amounts deducted from the compensation of a member and shall be included in determining his total contributions.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 513, § 13; Laws, 2010, ch. 528, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 25-13-29.
Actuarial valuation.

At least once in each biennium the administrative board shall cause an actuarial valuation to be made by an actuary who shall certify to the assets and liabilities of the system and the amount of employer’s contributions required for membership service and prior service. The cost of the survey shall be paid from any funds available to the Highway Safety Patrol.

On account of each member there shall be paid quarterly into the “Disability and Relief Fund for Members of the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol” by the Highway Safety Patrol from any funds available an amount equal to a certain percentage of the compensation of each member to be known as the “normal contributions,” and an additional amount equal to a percentage of his compensation to be known as the “accrued liability contribution.” The rate percent of such contributions shall be fixed by the administrative board on the basis of the liabilities of the retirement system for the various allowances and benefits as shown by the actuarial valuation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8090-65; Laws, 1958, ch. 543, § 15; Laws, 1966, ch. 620, § 4; Laws, 2002, ch. 627, § 18, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 25-13-31.
Exemption of benefits from taxation, legal execution, and assignment; deductions from retirement allowances for payment of employer or system sponsored group life or health insurance.

The right of a person to an annuity, a retirement allowance or benefit, or to the return of contributions, or to any optional benefits or any other right accrued or accruing to any person under the provisions of the Highway Patrol Retirement Law, the system and the monies in the system created by said law, are hereby exempt from any state, county or municipal ad valorem taxes, income taxes, premium taxes, privilege taxes, property taxes, sales and use taxes or other taxes not so named, notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, and exempt from levy and sale, garnishment, attachment, or any other process whatsoever, and shall be unassignable except as specifically otherwise provided in this article.

Any retired member or beneficiary receiving a retirement allowance or benefit under this article may authorize the Public Employees’ Retirement System to make deductions from the retirement allowance or benefit for the payment of employer or system sponsored group life or health insurance. The deductions authorized under this subsection shall be subject to rules and regulations adopted by the Board of Trustees of the Public Employees’ Retirement System.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 500, § 2; Laws, 1987, ch. 327, § 2; Laws, 1990, ch. 523, § 4; Laws, 1993, ch. 523, § 5; Laws, 2004, ch. 531, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 25-13-33.
Guaranty; vested rights to benefits; maximum annual retirement allowance.

The maintenance of actuarial reserves for the various allowances and benefits under this chapter, and the payment of all annuities, retirement allowances, refunds and other benefits granted under this chapter are made obligations of the disability and relief fund. All income, interest and dividends derived from deposits and investments authorized by this chapter shall be used for the payment of the obligations of the system.

In the event of the termination of the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol Retirement System, established pursuant to the provisions of Section 25-13-1 et seq., all members of the system as of the date of termination of the system shall be deemed to have a vested right to benefits to the extent and in the same manner that rights would be vested under the statute existing as of the date of termination of the system; except that any member who, because of a termination of the system has not fulfilled the requirements for length of service, shall be entitled to compensation as of the date that such member would otherwise be eligible, with such compensation to be computed on the basis of time actually a member of the service and compensation actually earned during the time as a member, in the manner now provided by statute.

In the event of a deficit in the availability of funds for payment due under the provisions of the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol Retirement System, an appropriation shall be made sufficient for the payment thereof as an obligation of the State of Mississippi.

Notwithstanding any provisions of this section or chapter to the contrary, the maximum annual retirement allowance attributable to the employer contributions payable by the system to a member shall be subject to the limitations set forth in Section 415 of the Internal Revenue Code and any regulations issued thereunder as applicable to governmental plans as the term is defined under Section 414(d) of the Internal Revenue Code.

The Board of Trustees of the Public Employees’ Retirement System is authorized to provide by rule or regulation for the payment of benefits as provided under this chapter to members or beneficiaries of the Highway Safety Patrol Retirement System at a time and under circumstances not otherwise provided for in this chapter to the extent that the payment is required to maintain the Highway Safety Patrol Retirement System as a qualified retirement plan for purposes of federal income tax laws.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this plan, all distributions from this plan shall conform to the regulations issued under Section 401(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code, applicable to governmental plans, as defined in Section 414(d) of the Internal Revenue Code, including the incidental death benefit provisions of Section 401(a)(9)(G) of the Internal Revenue Code. Further, such regulations shall override any plan provision that is inconsistent with Section 401(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code.

The actuarial assumptions used to convert a retirement allowance from the normal form of payment to an optional form of payment shall be an appendix to this chapter and subject to approval by the board of trustees based upon certification by the actuary.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this plan, the maximum compensation that can be considered for all plan purposes shall not be greater than that allowed under Section 401(a)(17) of the Internal Revenue Code.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 415, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 576 § 9; Laws, 1995, ch. 624, § 10; Laws, 2001, ch. 438, § 8; Laws, 2002, ch. 627, § 19; Laws, 2007, ch. 348, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

§ 25-13-35.
Repealed.

Repealed by its own terms, eff July 1, 1992.

[Laws, 1991, ch. 513, § 14]